Hawaii statutes.
§606-8 Powers and duties of clerks.
The clerks of the courts of record may issue process, administer oaths, take
depositions, and perform all other duties pertaining to their office. A clerk
shall attend and record the proceedings at all sittings of courts of record.

The clerks of the circuit courts shall be ex
officio masters in matters referred to them by the court. [L 1892, c 57, §62;
am L 1911, c 127, §2; RL 1925, §2297; RL 1935, §3696; RL 1945, §9727; RL 1955,
§218-8; HRS §606-8; am L 1972, c 88, §4(e)]

Case Notes

Chambers summonses were only issuable by clerks of the
circuit court under this section. 35 H. 689 (1940).

Cited: 12 H. 189, 195 (1899); 32 H. 995, 997 (1934); 33 H.
799, 804 (1936).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next